Maryland, session 2025, SB0936.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0936*

SENATE BILL 936
Article – Commercial Law
SUBTITLE 47A. HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE DEVELOPER ACT.
14–47A–01.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) (1) “ALGORITHMIC DISCRIMINATION” MEANS THE USE OF AN
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM THAT RESULTS IN AN UNLAWFUL DIFFERENTIAL
TREATMENT OR IMPACT THAT DISFAVORS AN INDIVIDUAL OR GROUP OF
INDIVIDUALS ON THE BASIS OF THE INDIVIDUAL’S OR GROUP’S ACTUAL OR
PERCEIVED:
(I) AGE;
(II) COLOR;
(III) DISABILITY;
(IV) ETHNICITY;
(V) GENETIC INFORMATION;
(VI) LIMITED PROFICIENCY IN THE ENGLISH LANGUAGE;
(VII) NATIONAL ORIGIN;
(VIII) RACE;
(IX) RELIGION;
(X) REPRODUCTIVE HEALTH;
(XI) SEX;
(XII) SEXUAL ORIENTATION;
(XIII) VETERAN STATUS; OR
(XIV) CLASSIFICATION OTHERWISE PROTECTED UNDER STATE
OR FEDERAL LAW.

SENATE BILL 936 3
(2) “ALGORITHMIC DISCRIMINATION” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) THE OFFER, LICENSE, OR USE OF A HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM BY A DEVELOPER OR DEPLOYER FOR THE SOLE PURPOSE OF
THE DEVELOPER’S OR DEPLOYER’S SELF–TESTING TO IDENTIFY, MITIGATE, OR
PREVENT DISCRIMINATION OR OTHERWISE ENSURE COMPLIANCE WITH STATE AND
FEDERAL LAW;
(II) THE EXPANSION OF AN APPLICANT, A CUSTOMER, OR A
PARTICIPANT POOL TO INCREASE DIVERSITY OR REDRESS HISTORICAL
DISCRIMINATION; OR
(III) AN ACT OR OMISSION BY OR ON BEHALF OF A PRIVATE CLUB
OR OTHER ESTABLISHMENT NOT IN FACT OPEN TO THE PUBLIC, AS PROVIDED BY
TITLE II OF THE CIVIL RIGHTS ACT OF 1964 UNDER 42 U.S.C. § 2000A(E).
(C) (1) “ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM” MEANS A MACHINE
LEARNING–BASED SYSTEM THAT FOR ANY EXPLICIT OR IMPLICIT OBJECTIVE,
INFERS FROM THE INPUTS THE SYSTEM RECEIVES HOW TO GENERATE OUTPUTS,
INCLUDING CONTENT, DECISIONS, PREDICTIONS, OR RECOMMENDATIONS THAT CAN
INFLUENCE PHYSICAL OR VIRTUAL ENVIRONMENTS.
(2) “ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM” DOES NOT INCLUDE AN
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM OR A MODEL THAT IS USED FOR DEVELOPMENT,
PROTOTYPING, AND RESEARCH ACTIVITIES BEFORE THE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
SYSTEM OR MODEL IS RELEASED ON THE MARKET.
(D) “CONSEQUENTIAL DECISION” MEANS A DECISION THAT HAS A
MATERIALLY LEGAL OR SIMILARLY SIGNIFICANT EFFECT ON THE PROVISION OR
DENIAL TO A CONSUMER OF:
(1) PAROLE, PROBATION, A PARDON, OR ANY OTHER RELEASE FROM
INCARCERATION OR COURT SUPERVISION;
(2) EDUCATION ENROLLMENT OR EDUCATION OPPORTUNITY;
(3) ACCESS TO OR PROVISION OF EMPLOYMENT;
(4) FINANCIAL OR LENDING SERVICES;
(5) ACCESS TO OR THE PROVISION OF HEALTH CARE SERVICES;

SENATE BILL 936
(6) HOUSING;
(7) INSURANCE;
(8) MARITAL STATUS; OR
(9) LEGAL SERVICE.
(E) (1) “CONSUMER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS A RESIDENT OF THE
STATE AND IS ACTING ONLY IN A PERSONAL OR HOUSEHOLD CONTEXT.
(2) “CONSUMER” DOES NOT INCLUDE AN INDIVIDUAL ACTING IN A
COMMERCIAL OR EMPLOYMENT CONTEXT.
(F) “DEPLOYER” MEANS A PERSON DOING BUSINESS IN THE STATE THAT
DEPLOYS OR USES A HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM TO MAKE A
CONSEQUENTIAL DECISION IN THE STATE.
(G) “DEVELOPER” MEANS A PERSON DOING BUSINESS IN THE STATE THAT
DEVELOPS OR INTENTIONALLY AND SUBSTANTIALLY MODIFIES A HIGH–RISK
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM THAT IS OFFERED, SOLD, LEASED, GIVEN, OR
OTHERWISE PROVIDED TO CONSUMERS IN THE STATE.
(H) (1) “GENERAL–PURPOSE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE MODEL” MEANS
A MODEL USED BY AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM THAT:
(I) DISPLAYS SIGNIFICANT GENERALITY;
(II) IS CAPABLE OF COMPETENTLY PERFORMING A WIDE RANGE
OF DISTINCT TASKS; AND
(III) CAN BE INTEGRATED INTO A VARIETY OF DOWNSTREAM
APPLICATIONS OR SYSTEMS.
(2) “GENERAL–PURPOSE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE MODEL” DOES
NOT INCLUDE AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE MODEL THAT IS USED FOR
DEVELOPMENT, PROTOTYPING, AND RESEARCH ACTIVITIES BEFORE THE
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE MODEL IS RELEASED ON THE MARKET.
(I) “GENERATIVE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE” MEANS ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE THAT IS CAPABLE OF AND USED TO PRODUCE SYNTHETIC CONTENT,
INCLUDING AUDIO, IMAGES, TEXT, AND VIDEOS.

SENATE BILL 936 5
(J) “GENERATIVE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM” MEANS ANY
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM OR SERVICE THAT INCORPORATES GENERATIVE
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE.
(K) (1) “HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM” MEANS AN
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM THAT IS SPECIFICALLY INTENDED TO
AUTONOMOUSLY MAKE, OR BE A SUBSTANTIAL FACTOR IN MAKING, A
CONSEQUENTIAL DECISION.
(2) “HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM” DOES NOT
INCLUDE:
(I) AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM THAT IS INTENDED
TO:
1. PERFORM A NARROW PROCEDURAL TASK;
2. IMPROVE THE RESULT OF A PREVIOUSLY COMPLETED
HUMAN ACTIVITY;
3. DETECT ANY DECISION–MAKING PATTERNS OR ANY
DEVIATIONS FROM PREEXISTING DECISION–MAKING PATTERNS; OR
4. PERFORM A PREPARATORY TASK TO AN ASSESSMENT
RELEVANT TO A CONSEQUENTIAL DECISION; OR
(II) THE FOLLOWING TECHNOLOGIES:
1. ANTIFRAUD TECHNOLOGY THAT DOES NOT USE
FACIAL RECOGNITION TECHNOLOGY;
2. ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE–ENABLED VIDEO GAME
TECHNOLOGY;
3. ANTIMALWARE AND ANTIVIRUS TECHNOLOGY;
4. AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE TECHNOLOGY;
5. CALCULATORS;
6. CYBERSECURITY TECHNOLOGY;
7. DATABASES AND DATA STORAGE;

SENATE BILL 936
8. FIREWALL TECHNOLOGY;
9. INTERNET DOMAIN REGISTRATION;
10. INTERNET WEBSITE LOADING;
11. NETWORKING;
12. SPAM AND ROBOCALL FILTERING;
13. SPELLCHECKING TECHNOLOGY;
14. SPREADSHEETS;
15. WEB CACHING;
16. WEB HOSTING OR SIMILAR TECHNOLOGY; OR
17. TECHNOLOGY THAT COMMUNICATES WITH
CONSUMERS IN NATURAL LANGUAGE FOR THE PURPOSE OF PROVIDING USERS WITH
INFORMATION, MAKING REFERRALS OR RECOMMENDATIONS, AND ANSWERING
QUESTIONS AND IS SUBJECT TO AN ACCEPTABLE USE POLICY THAT PROHIBITS
GENERATING CONTENT THAT IS DISCRIMINATORY OR UNLAWFUL.
(L) (1) “INTENTIONAL AND SUBSTANTIAL MODIFICATION” MEANS A
DELIBERATE CHANGE MADE TO:
(I) AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM THAT RESULTS IN A
NEW MATERIAL RISK OF ALGORITHMIC DISCRIMINATION; OR
(II) A GENERAL–PURPOSE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE MODEL
THAT:
1. AFFECTS COMPLIANCE OF THE GENERAL–PURPOSE
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE MODEL;
2. MATERIALLY CHANGES THE PURPOSE OF THE
GENERAL–PURPOSE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE MODEL; OR
3. RESULTS IN ANY NEW REASONABLY FORESEEABLE
RISK OF ALGORITHMIC DISCRIMINATION.

SENATE BILL 936 7
(2) “INTENTIONAL AND SUBSTANTIAL MODIFICATION” DOES NOT
INCLUDE A CHANGE MADE TO A HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM, OR
THE PERFORMANCE OF A HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM, IF:
(I) THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM
CONTINUES TO LEARN AFTER THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM IS
DEPLOYED OR OFFERED, SOLD, LEASED, LICENSED, GIVEN, OR OTHERWISE MADE
AVAILABLE TO A DEPLOYER; AND
(II) THE CHANGE:
1. IS MADE TO THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM AS A RESULT OF ANY LEARNING DESCRIBED IN ITEM (I) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH;
2. WAS PREDETERMINED BY THE DEPLOYER OR THE
THIRD PARTY CONTRACTED BY THE DEPLOYER; AND
3. INCLUDED AND CONCLUDED WITHIN THE INITIAL
IMPACT ASSESSMENT OF THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM
UNDER § 14–47A–04(C) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(M) (1) “PERSON” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL, AN ASSOCIATION, A
COOPERATIVE, A CORPORATION, A LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY, A PARTNERSHIP,
A TRUST, A JOINT VENTURE, OR ANY OTHER LEGAL OR COMMERCIAL ENTITY AND
ANY SUCCESSOR, REPRESENTATIVE, AGENCY, OR INSTRUMENTALITY THEREOF.
(2) “PERSON” DOES NOT INCLUDE A GOVERNMENTAL UNIT.
(N) “PRINCIPAL BASIS” MEANS THE USE OF AN OUTPUT OF A HIGH–RISK
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM TO MAKE A DECISION WITHOUT:
(1) HUMAN REVIEW, OVERSIGHT, INVOLVEMENT, OR INTERVENTION;
OR
(2) MEANINGFUL CONSIDERATION BY A HUMAN.
(O) (1) “SUBSTANTIAL FACTOR” MEANS A FACTOR GENERATED BY AN
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM THAT IS:
(I) THE PRINCIPAL BASIS FOR MAKING A CONSEQUENTIAL
DECISION; OR

SENATE BILL 936
(II) CAPABLE OF ALTERING THE OUTCOME OF A
CONSEQUENTIAL DECISION.
(2) “SUBSTANTIAL FACTOR” INCLUDES ANY USE OF AN ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM TO GENERATE ANY CONTENT, DECISION, PREDICTION, OR
RECOMMENDATION CONCERNING A CONSUMER THAT IS USED AS THE PRINCIPAL
BASIS TO MAKE A CONSEQUENTIAL DECISION CONCERNING THE CONSUMER.
(P) “SYNTHETIC CONTENT” MEANS INFORMATION, SUCH AS AUDIO CLIPS,
IMAGES, TEXT, AND VIDEO, THAT IS PRODUCED OR SIGNIFICANTLY MODIFIED OR
GENERATED BY ALGORITHMS, INCLUDING BY AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
SYSTEM.
14–47A–02.
THIS SUBTITLE DOES NOT APPLY TO:
(1) EXCEPT IN A SITUATION WHERE A HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM IS USED TO MAKE, OR IS A SUBSTANTIAL FACTOR IN MAKING,
A DECISION CONCERNING EMPLOYMENT OR HOUSING, A DEVELOPER OR DEPLOYER
THAT USES AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM ACQUIRED BY OR FOR THE
FEDERAL GOVERNMENT OR ANY FEDERAL AGENCY OR DEPARTMENT, INCLUDING:
(I) THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE;
(II) THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF DEFENSE; AND
(III) THE NATIONAL AERONAUTICS AND SPACE
ADMINISTRATION;
(2) AN INSURER, OR A HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM
DEVELOPED OR DEPLOYED BY AN INSURER FOR USE IN THE BUSINESS OF
INSURANCE, IF THE INSURER IS REGULATED AND SUPERVISED BY THE INSURANCE
ADMINISTRATION AND SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS UNDER TITLE 13 OF THIS
ARTICLE; OR
(3) A DEVELOPER, A DEPLOYER, OR ANY OTHER PERSON WHO:
(I) IS A COVERED ENTITY UNDER THE FEDERAL HEALTH
INSURANCE PORTABILITY AND ACCOUNTABILITY ACT OF 1996 UNDER 42 U.S.C. §
1320D THROUGH 1320D–9, AND THE CORRESPONDING FEDERAL REGULATIONS;
AND

SENATE BILL 936 9
(II) PROVIDES:
1. HEALTH CARE RECOMMENDATIONS GENERATED BY
AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM IN WHICH A HEALTH CARE PROVIDER IS
REQUIRED TO TAKE ACTION TO IMPLEMENT THE HEALTH CARE
RECOMMENDATIONS; OR
2. SERVICES USING AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
SYSTEM FOR AN ADMINISTRATIVE, FINANCIAL, QUALITY MEASUREMENT, SECURITY,
OR PERFORMANCE IMPROVEMENT FUNCTION.
14–47A–03.
(A) (1) BEGINNING FEBRUARY 1, 2026, A DEVELOPER OF A
HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM SHALL USE REASONABLE CARE TO
PROTECT CONSUMERS FROM ANY KNOWN OR REASONABLY FORESEEABLE RISKS OF
ALGORITHMIC DISCRIMINATION.
(2) IN AN ENFORCEMENT ACTION BROUGHT BY THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL UNDER THIS SUBTITLE, THERE SHALL BE A REBUTTABLE PRESUMPTION
THAT A DEVELOPER USED REASONABLE CARE AS REQUIRED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION IF THE DEVELOPER COMPLIED WITH THE PROVISIONS OF THIS
SECTION.
(B) BEGINNING FEBRUARY 1, 2026, AND SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (D) OF
THIS SECTION, A DEVELOPER OF A HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM
MAY NOT OFFER, SELL, LEASE, GIVE, OR OTHERWISE PROVIDE TO A DEPLOYER, OR
OTHER DEVELOPER, A HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM, UNLESS THE
DEVELOPER MAKES AVAILABLE TO THE DEPLOYER OR OTHER DEVELOPER:
(1) A STATEMENT DISCLOSING THE INTENDED USES OF THE
HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM;
(2) DOCUMENTATION DISCLOSING:
(I) THE KNOWN OR REASONABLY FORESEEABLE LIMITATIONS
OF THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM, INCLUDING THE KNOWN OR
REASONABLY FORESEEABLE RISKS OF ALGORITHMIC DISCRIMINATION ARISING
FROM THE INTENDED USES OF THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM;
(II) THE PURPOSE OF THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM AND THE INTENDED BENEFITS AND USES OF THE HIGH–RISK
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM;

SENATE BILL 936
(III) A SUMMARY DESCRIBING THE MANNER IN WHICH THE
HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM WAS EVALUATED FOR
PERFORMANCE BEFORE THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM WAS
LICENSED, SOLD, LEASED, GIVEN, OR OTHERWISE MADE AVAILABLE TO A DEPLOYER;
(IV) THE MEASURES THE DEVELOPER HAS TAKEN TO MITIGATE
REASONABLY FORESEEABLE RISKS OF ALGORITHMIC DISCRIMINATION THAT THE
DEVELOPER KNOWS ARISES FROM DEPLOYMENT OR USE OF THE HIGH–RISK
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM; AND
(V) THE MANNER IN WHICH AN INDIVIDUAL CAN USE THE
HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM AND MONITOR THE PERFORMANCE
OF THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM FOR RISK OF ALGORITHMIC
DISCRIMINATION;
(3) DOCUMENTATION DESCRIBING:
(I) THE MANNER IN WHICH THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM WAS EVALUATED FOR PERFORMANCE, AND MITIGATION OF
ALGORITHMIC DISCRIMINATION BEFORE THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM WAS OFFERED, SOLD, LEASED, LICENSED, GIVEN, OR
OTHERWISE MADE AVAILABLE TO THE DEPLOYER OR OTHER DEVELOPER;
(II) A HIGH–LEVEL SUMMARY OF THE MANNER IN WHICH DATA
SOURCES WERE EVALUATED FOR POTENTIAL BIAS AND APPROPRIATE MITIGATIONS
WERE APPLIED;
(III) THE INTENDED OUTPUTS OF THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM;
(IV) THE MEASURES THE DEVELOPER HAS TAKEN TO MITIGATE
ANY KNOWN OR REASONABLY FORESEEABLE RISKS OF ALGORITHMIC
DISCRIMINATION THAT MAY ARISE FROM REASONABLY FORESEEABLE DEPLOYMENT
OF THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM; AND
(V) THE MANNER IN WHICH THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM SHOULD BE USED, NOT USED, AND MONITORED BY AN
INDIVIDUAL WHEN BEING USED; AND
(4) ANY ADDITIONAL DOCUMENTATION THAT IS REASONABLY
NECESSARY TO ASSIST A DEPLOYER TO:

SENATE BILL 936 11
(I) UNDERSTAND THE OUTPUTS OF THE HIGH–RISK
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM; AND
(II) MONITOR THE PERFORMANCE OF THE HIGH–RISK
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM FOR RISKS OF ALGORITHMIC DISCRIMINATION.
(C) (1) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, A DEVELOPER
THAT, ON OR AFTER FEBRUARY 1, 2026, OFFERS, SELLS, LEASES, LICENSES, GIVES,
OR OTHERWISE MAKES AVAILABLE TO A DEPLOYER OR OTHER DEVELOPER A
HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM, TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE,
SHALL MAKE AVAILABLE TO DEPLOYERS AND OTHER DEVELOPERS THE
DOCUMENTATION AND INFORMATION NECESSARY FOR A DEPLOYER OR THIRD
PARTY CONTRACTED BY A DEPLOYER TO COMPLETE AN IMPACT ASSESSMENT
UNDER § 14–47A–04(C) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) THE DEVELOPER SHALL MAKE DOCUMENTATION AND
INFORMATION AVAILABLE AS REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION THROUGH:
(I) ARTIFACTS, INCLUDING MODEL CARD FILES THAT
ACCOMPANY THE MODEL AND PROVIDE INFORMATION ABOUT DISCOVERABILITY,
REPRODUCIBILITY, AND SHARING;
(II) DATASET CARD FILES THAT:
1. ARE USED TO INFORM USERS ABOUT HOW TO
RESPONSIBLY USE THE DATA IN A DATASET; AND
2. CONTAIN INFORMATION ABOUT POTENTIAL BIASES
OF THE DATA; OR
(III) OTHER IMPACT ASSESSMENTS.
(D) (1) FOR ANY DISCLOSURE REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION, A
DEVELOPER, NOT LATER THAN 90 DAYS AFTER THE DEVELOPER PERFORMS AN
INTENTIONAL AND SUBSTANTIAL MODIFICATION TO A HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM, SHALL UPDATE THE DISCLOSURE TO ENSURE ACCURACY.
(2) A DEVELOPER THAT ALSO SERVES AS A DEPLOYER FOR ANY
HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM IS NOT REQUIRED TO GENERATE
THE DOCUMENTATION REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION UNLESS THE HIGH–RISK
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM IS PROVIDED TO AN UNAFFILIATED ENTITY
ACTING AS A DEPLOYER OR AS OTHERWISE REQUIRED BY LAW.

SENATE BILL 936
(E) A HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM SHALL BE PRESUMED
TO SATISFY THE APPLICABLE REQUIREMENTS UNDER THIS SECTION AND ANY
REGULATIONS ADOPTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE IF THE HIGH–RISK
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM IS IN CONFORMITY WITH THE LATEST VERSION
OF:
(1) THE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE RISK MANAGEMENT
FRAMEWORK PUBLISHED BY THE NATIONAL INSTITUTE OF STANDARDS AND
TECHNOLOGY;
(2) STANDARD ISO/IEC 42001 OF THE INTERNATIONAL
ORGANIZATION FOR STANDARDIZATION; OR
(3) ANOTHER NATIONALLY OR INTERNATIONALLY RECOGNIZED RISK
MANAGEMENT FRAMEWORK FOR ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEMS THAT IS
SUBSTANTIALLY EQUIVALENT TO, AND AT LEAST AS STRINGENT AS, THE
REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SECTION.
(F) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO REQUIRE A DEVELOPER TO
DISCLOSE ANY INFORMATION:
(1) THAT IS A TRADE SECRET, AS DEFINED IN § 11–1201 OF THIS
ARTICLE, OR OTHERWISE PROTECTED FROM DISCLOSURE UNDER STATE OR
FEDERAL LAW; OR
(2) THE DISCLOSURE OF WHICH WOULD:
(I) PRESENT A SECURITY RISK TO THE DEVELOPER; OR
(II) REQUIRE THE DEVELOPER TO DISCLOSE CONFIDENTIAL OR
PROPRIETARY INFORMATION.
(G) (1) EACH DEVELOPER OF A GENERATIVE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
SYSTEM THAT GENERATES OR MODIFIES SYNTHETIC CONTENT SHALL ENSURE THAT
THE OUTPUTS OF THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM:
(I) ARE MARKED AT THE TIME THE OUTPUT IS GENERATED AND
IN A MANNER THAT IS DETECTABLE BY CONSUMERS; AND
(II) COMPLY WITH ANY ACCESSIBILITY REQUIREMENTS.

SENATE BILL 936 13
(2) FOR SYNTHETIC CONTENT THAT IS AN AUDIO, IMAGE, OR VIDEO
FORMED AS PART OF AN ARTISTIC, CREATIVE, SATIRICAL, FICTIONAL ANALOGOUS
WORK OR PROGRAM, A MARKING OF HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
SYSTEMS UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE LIMITED IN A
MANNER NOT TO HINDER THE DISPLAY OR ENJOYMENT OF THE WORK OR PROGRAM.
(3) THE MARKING OF OUTPUTS REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO:
(I) SYNTHETIC CONTENT THAT:
1. CONSISTS EXCLUSIVELY OF TEXT;
2. IS PUBLISHED TO INFORM THE PUBLIC ON ANY
MATTER OF PUBLIC INTEREST; OR
3. IS UNLIKELY TO MISLEAD A REASONABLE PERSON
CONSUMING THE SYNTHETIC CONTENT; OR
(II) THE OUTPUTS OF A HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
SYSTEM THAT:
1. PERFORMS AN ASSISTIVE FUNCTION FOR STANDARD
EDITING;
2. DOES NOT SUBSTANTIALLY ALTER THE INPUT DATA
PROVIDED BY THE DEVELOPER, OR IS USED TO DETECT, PREVENT, OR INVESTIGATE;
OR
3. PROSECUTES A CRIME AS AUTHORIZED BY LAW.
14–47A–04.
(A) (1) BEGINNING FEBRUARY 1, 2026, EACH DEPLOYER SHALL USE
REASONABLE CARE TO PROTECT CONSUMERS FROM ANY KNOWN OR REASONABLY
FORESEEABLE RISKS OF ALGORITHMIC DISCRIMINATION.
(2) IN AN ENFORCEMENT ACTION BROUGHT BY THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL UNDER THIS SUBTITLE, THERE SHALL BE A REBUTTABLE PRESUMPTION
THAT A DEPLOYER USED REASONABLE CARE AS REQUIRED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION IF THE DEPLOYER COMPLIED WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS
SECTION.

SENATE BILL 936
(B) (1) BEGINNING FEBRUARY 1, 2026, AND SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2)
OF THIS SUBSECTION, A DEPLOYER OF A HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
SYSTEM SHALL DESIGN, IMPLEMENT, AND MAINTAIN A RISK MANAGEMENT POLICY
AND PROGRAM FOR THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM.
(2) EACH RISK MANAGEMENT POLICY DESIGNED, IMPLEMENTED,
AND MAINTAINED IN ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION
SHALL:
(I) SPECIFY THE PRINCIPLES, PROCESSES, AND PERSONNEL
THAT THE DEPLOYER USES TO IDENTIFY, MITIGATE, AND DOCUMENT ANY RISK OF
ALGORITHMIC DISCRIMINATION THAT IS A REASONABLY FORESEEABLE
CONSEQUENCE OF DEPLOYING OR USING THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM;
(II) BE REGULARLY REVIEWED AND UPDATED OVER THE LIFE
CYCLE OF THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM; AND
(III) BE REASONABLE AND IN CONSIDERATION OF THE
GUIDANCE AND STANDARDS PROVIDED IN THE LATEST VERSION OF:
1. THE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE RISK MANAGEMENT
FRAMEWORK PUBLISHED BY THE NATIONAL INSTITUTE OF STANDARDS AND
TECHNOLOGY;
2. STANDARD ISO/IEC 42001 OF THE INTERNATIONAL
ORGANIZATION FOR STANDARDIZATION;
3. ANOTHER NATIONALLY OR INTERNATIONALLY
RECOGNIZED RISK MANAGEMENT FRAMEWORK FOR ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
SYSTEMS WITH REQUIREMENTS THAT ARE SUBSTANTIALLY EQUIVALENT TO, AND AT
LEAST AS STRINGENT AS, THE REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SECTION;
OR
4. ANY RISK MANAGEMENT FRAMEWORK FOR
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEMS THAT THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY
DESIGNATE AND IS SUBSTANTIALLY EQUIVALENT TO, AND AT LEAST AS STRINGENT
AS, THE GUIDANCE AND STANDARDS OF THE FRAMEWORK DESCRIBED IN ITEM 1 OF
THIS ITEM.
(3) A HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM SHALL BE
PRESUMED TO SATISFY THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER THIS SECTION AND ANY
REGULATIONS ADOPTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE IF THE HIGH–RISK

SENATE BILL 936 15
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM IS IN CONFORMITY WITH THE LATEST VERSION
OF:
(I) THE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE RISK MANAGEMENT
FRAMEWORK PUBLISHED BY THE NATIONAL INSTITUTE OF STANDARDS AND
TECHNOLOGY;
(II) STANDARD ISO/IEC 42001 OF THE INTERNATIONAL
ORGANIZATION FOR STANDARDIZATION; OR
(III) ANOTHER NATIONALLY OR INTERNATIONALLY
RECOGNIZED RISK MANAGEMENT FRAMEWORK FOR ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
SYSTEMS THAT ARE SUBSTANTIALLY EQUIVALENT TO, AND AT LEAST AS STRINGENT
AS, THE REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SECTION.
(C) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION AND
EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS SUBSECTION:
(I) ON OR AFTER FEBRUARY 1, 2026, BEFORE INITIAL
DEPLOYMENT OF A HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM OR USE OF A
HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM, A DEPLOYER SHALL COMPLETE AN
IMPACT ASSESSMENT OF THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM; AND
(II) AT LEAST 90 DAYS BEFORE A SIGNIFICANT UPDATE TO A
HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM IS MADE AVAILABLE, A DEPLOYER
SHALL COMPLETE AN IMPACT ASSESSMENT OF THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM IF THE UPDATE PRODUCES A NEW VERSION OR RELEASE OR
SIMILAR CHANGE TO THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM THAT:
1. INTRODUCES SIGNIFICANT CHANGES TO THE USE
CASE OR KEY FUNCTIONALITY OF THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
SYSTEM; AND
2. RESULTS IN A NEW OR REASONABLY FORESEEABLE
RISK OF ALGORITHMIC DISCRIMINATION.
(2) EACH IMPACT ASSESSMENT COMPLETED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)
OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) A STATEMENT BY THE DEPLOYER DISCLOSING THE
PURPOSE AND INTENDED USE CASES AND DEPLOYMENT CONTEXT OF, AND BENEFITS
AFFORDED BY, THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM;

SENATE BILL 936
(II) AN ANALYSIS OF WHETHER THE DEPLOYMENT OF THE
HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM:
1. POSES ANY KNOWN OR REASONABLY FORESEEABLE
RISKS OF ALGORITHMIC DISCRIMINATION;
2. THE NATURE OF ANY ALGORITHMIC
DISCRIMINATION; AND
3. THE STEPS THAT HAVE BEEN TAKEN TO MITIGATE
RISKS;
(III) FOR A POSTDEPLOYMENT IMPACT ASSESSMENT
COMPLETED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, AN ANALYSIS OF WHETHER THE INTENDED
USE CASES OF THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM, AS UPDATED,
WERE CONSISTENT WITH, OR VARIED FROM, THE DEVELOPER’S INTENDED USES OF
THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM;
(IV) A DESCRIPTION OF THE CATEGORIES OF DATA THE
HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM PROCESSES AS INPUTS AND THE
OUTPUTS THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM PRODUCES;
(V) IF THE DEPLOYER USED DATA TO CUSTOMIZE THE
HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM, AN OVERVIEW OF THE CATEGORIES
OF DATA THE DEPLOYER USED TO CUSTOMIZE THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM;
(VI) A LIST OF METRICS USED TO EVALUATE THE PERFORMANCE
AND KNOWN LIMITATIONS OF THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM;
(VII) A DESCRIPTION OF TRANSPARENCY MEASURES TAKEN
CONCERNING THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM, INCLUDING ANY
MEASURES TAKEN TO DISCLOSE TO A CONSUMER THAT A HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM IS IN USE WHEN THE CONSUMER IS ENGAGING OR
INTERACTING WITH A SYSTEM OR PRODUCT IN WHICH A HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM IS IN USE;
(VIII) A DESCRIPTION OF POSTDEPLOYMENT MONITORING AND
USER SAFEGUARDS RELATED TO THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
SYSTEM, INCLUDING THE OVERSIGHT PROCESS ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPLOYER TO
ADDRESS ISSUES ARISING FROM DEPLOYMENT OR USE OF A HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM; AND

SENATE BILL 936 17
(IX) AN ANALYSIS OF THE VALIDITY AND RELIABILITY OF THE
HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM, IN ACCORDANCE WITH
CONTEMPORARY SOCIAL SCIENCE STANDARDS AND A DESCRIPTION OF METRICS TO
EVALUATE PERFORMANCE AND KNOWN LIMITATIONS OF THE HIGH–RISK
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM.
(3) A DEPLOYER SHALL MAINTAIN A COMPLETED IMPACT
ASSESSMENT OF A HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM REQUIRED
UNDER THIS SECTION AND ALL RECORDS CONCERNING THE IMPACT ASSESSMENT
FOR AT LEAST 3 YEARS.
(4) A SINGLE IMPACT ASSESSMENT MAY ADDRESS A COMPARABLE
SET OF HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEMS DEPLOYED BY A DEPLOYER.
(D) BEGINNING FEBRUARY 1, 2026, BEFORE A DEPLOYER DEPLOYS A
HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM, THE DEPLOYER SHALL:
(1) NOTIFY THE CONSUMER THAT THE DEPLOYER HAS DEPLOYED A
HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM TO MAKE, OR BE A SUBSTANTIAL
FACTOR IN MAKING, A CONSEQUENTIAL DECISION ABOUT THE CONSUMER; AND
(2) PROVIDE TO THE CONSUMER:
(I) A STATEMENT DISCLOSING THE PURPOSE OF THE
HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM AND THE NATURE OF THE
CONSEQUENTIAL DECISION;
(II) IF APPLICABLE, INFORMATION CONCERNING THE
CONSUMER’S RIGHT TO OPT OUT OF THE PROCESSING OF THE CONSUMER’S
PERSONAL DATA IN ACCORDANCE WITH STATE OR FEDERAL LAW;
(III) CONTACT INFORMATION FOR THE DEPLOYER; AND
(IV) A DESCRIPTION, IN PLAIN LANGUAGE, OF THE HIGH–RISK
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM, INCLUDING:
1. THE PERSONAL CHARACTERISTICS OR ATTRIBUTES
THE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM WILL MEASURE OR ASSESS AND THE
METHOD BY WHICH THE SYSTEM MEASURES OR ASSESSES PERSONAL
CHARACTERISTICS OR ATTRIBUTES;

SENATE BILL 936
2. THE RELEVANCE OF PERSONAL CHARACTERISTICS
OR ATTRIBUTES TO CONSEQUENTIAL DECISIONS RELATED TO THE ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM;
3. ANY HUMAN COMPONENTS OF THE ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM;
4. THE MANNER IN WHICH AUTOMATED COMPONENTS
OF THE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM ARE USED TO INFORM CONSEQUENTIAL
DECISIONS RELATED TO THE SYSTEM; AND
5. A DIRECT LINK TO A PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE WEBPAGE
ON THE DEPLOYER’S WEBSITE THAT CONTAINS A DESCRIPTION IN PLAIN LANGUAGE
OF THE LOGIC USED IN THE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM, INCLUDING:
A. KEY PARAMETERS THAT AFFECT THE OUTPUT OF THE
SYSTEM;
B. THE TYPE AND SOURCE OF DATA COLLECTED FROM
INDIVIDUALS AND PROCESSED BY THE SYSTEM IN MAKING OR ASSISTING IN MAKING
A CONSEQUENTIAL DECISION; AND
C. THE RESULTS OF THE MOST RECENT IMPACT
ASSESSMENT REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION.
(E) BEGINNING FEBRUARY 1, 2026, AND SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (F) OF
THIS SECTION, A DEPLOYER THAT HAS DEPLOYED A HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM SHALL, IF A CONSEQUENTIAL DECISION IS ADVERSE TO THE
CONSUMER, PROVIDE TO THE CONSUMER:
(1) A STATEMENT DISCLOSING THE PRINCIPAL REASON OR REASONS
FOR THE ADVERSE CONSEQUENTIAL DECISION, INCLUDING:
(I) THE DEGREE TO WHICH, AND MANNER IN WHICH, THE
HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM CONTRIBUTED TO THE ADVERSE
CONSEQUENTIAL DECISION;
(II) THE TYPE OF DATA THAT WERE PROCESSED BY THE
HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM IN MAKING THE ADVERSE
CONSEQUENTIAL DECISION; AND
(III) THE SOURCE OF THE DATA DESCRIBED IN ITEM (II) OF THIS
ITEM; AND

SENATE BILL 936 19
(2) AN OPPORTUNITY TO:
(I) CORRECT ANY INCORRECT PERSONAL DATA THAT THE
HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM PROCESSED IN MAKING, OR USED AS
A SUBSTANTIAL FACTOR IN MAKING, THE ADVERSE CONSEQUENTIAL DECISION; AND
(II) APPEAL THE ADVERSE CONSEQUENTIAL DECISION,
ALLOWING FOR HUMAN REVIEW UNLESS PROVIDING THIS OPPORTUNITY:
1. IS NOT IN THE BEST INTEREST OF THE CONSUMER; OR
2. MAY CAUSE A DELAY THAT POSES A RISK TO THE LIFE
OR SAFETY OF THE CONSUMER.
(F) THE DEPLOYER SHALL PROVIDE THE INFORMATION REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SUBSECTION:
(1) DIRECTLY TO THE CONSUMER;
(2) IN PLAIN LANGUAGE THAT IS TRANSLATED TO ANY LANGUAGES IN
WHICH THE DEPLOYER, IN THE ORDINARY COURSE OF SUCH DEPLOYER’S BUSINESS,
PROVIDES CONTRACTS, DISCLAIMERS, SALE ANNOUNCEMENTS, AND ANY OTHER
INFORMATION TO CONSUMERS; AND
(3) IN A FORMAT THAT IS ACCESSIBLE TO CONSUMERS WITH
DISABILITIES.
14–47A–05.
(A) THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO
RESTRICT A DEVELOPER’S, A DEPLOYER’S, OR ANOTHER PERSON’S ABILITY TO:
(1) COMPLY WITH FEDERAL, STATE, OR LOCAL LAW;
(2) COMPLY WITH A CIVIL, CRIMINAL, OR REGULATORY INQUIRY, AN
INVESTIGATION, OR A SUBPOENA OR SUMMONS BY A FEDERAL, STATE, LOCAL, OR
OTHER GOVERNMENTAL AUTHORITY;
(3) COOPERATE WITH A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY CONCERNING
CONDUCT OR ACTIVITY THAT THE DEVELOPER, DEPLOYER, OR OTHER PERSON
REASONABLY AND IN GOOD FAITH BELIEVES MAY VIOLATE FEDERAL, STATE, OR
LOCAL LAW;

SENATE BILL 936
(4) INVESTIGATE, ESTABLISH, EXERCISE, PREPARE FOR, OR DEFEND
A LEGAL CLAIM;
(5) TAKE IMMEDIATE STEPS TO PROTECT AN INTEREST THAT IS
ESSENTIAL FOR THE LIFE OR PHYSICAL SAFETY OF A CONSUMER OR ANOTHER
INDIVIDUAL;
(6) (I) BY ANY MEANS OTHER THAN FACIAL RECOGNITION
TECHNOLOGY, PREVENT, DETECT, PROTECT AGAINST, OR RESPOND TO:
1. A SECURITY INCIDENT;
2. A MALICIOUS OR DECEPTIVE ACTIVITY; OR
3. IDENTITY THEFT, FRAUD, HARASSMENT, OR ANY
OTHER ILLEGAL ACTIVITY;
(II) INVESTIGATE, REPORT, OR PROSECUTE THE PERSONS
RESPONSIBLE FOR ANY ACTION DESCRIBED IN ITEM (I) OF THIS ITEM; OR
(III) PRESERVE THE INTEGRITY OR SECURITY OF SYSTEMS;
(7) ENGAGE IN PUBLIC OR PEER–REVIEWED SCIENTIFIC OR
STATISTICAL RESEARCH IN THE PUBLIC INTEREST THAT:
(I) ADHERES TO ALL OTHER APPLICABLE ETHICS AND PRIVACY
LAWS; AND
(II) IS APPROVED, MONITORED, AND GOVERNED BY AN
INSTITUTIONAL REVIEW BOARD OR SIMILAR INDEPENDENT OVERSIGHT ENTITY
THAT DETERMINES:
1. WHETHER THE EXPECTED BENEFITS OF THE
RESEARCH OUTWEIGH THE RISKS ASSOCIATED WITH THE RESEARCH; AND
2. WHETHER THE DEVELOPER OR DEPLOYER HAS
IMPLEMENTED REASONABLE SAFEGUARDS TO MITIGATE THE RISKS ASSOCIATED
WITH THE RESEARCH;
(8) CONDUCT RESEARCH, TESTING, AND DEVELOPMENT ACTIVITIES
REGARDING AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM OR MODEL, OTHER THAN
TESTING CONDUCTED UNDER REAL–WORLD CONDITIONS, BEFORE AN ARTIFICIAL

SENATE BILL 936 21
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM OR MODEL IS PLACED ON THE MARKET, DEPLOYED OR PUT
INTO SERVICE, AS APPLICABLE;
(9) EFFECTUATE A PRODUCT RECALL;
(10) IDENTIFY AND REPAIR TECHNICAL ERRORS THAT IMPAIR
EXISTING OR INTENDED FUNCTIONALITY; OR
(11) ASSIST ANOTHER DEVELOPER, DEPLOYER, OR PERSON WITH ANY
OF THE OBLIGATIONS IMPOSED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) THE OBLIGATIONS IMPOSED ON DEVELOPERS, DEPLOYERS, OR OTHER
PERSONS UNDER THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT APPLY WHEN COMPLIANCE BY THE
DEVELOPER, DEPLOYER, OR OTHER PERSON WOULD VIOLATE AN EVIDENTIARY
PRIVILEGE UNDER THE LAWS OF THE STATE.
14–47A–06.
(A) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SUBTITLE IS SUBJECT TO A FINE NOT
EXCEEDING $1,000 AND, AS APPLICABLE, REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES,
EXPENSES, AND COSTS, AS DETERMINED BY THE COURT.
(B) A PERSON WHO WILLFULLY VIOLATES THIS SUBTITLE IS SUBJECT TO A
FINE OF AT LEAST $1,000 AND NOT EXCEEDING $10,000 AND, AS APPLICABLE,
REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES, EXPENSES, AND COSTS, AS DETERMINED BY THE
COURT.
(C) EACH VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE IS A SEPARATE VIOLATION
SUBJECT TO THE CIVIL PENALTIES IMPOSED UNDER THIS SECTION.
14–47A–07.
(A) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY ENFORCE THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) TO CARRY OUT THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL MAY:
(1) REQUIRE THAT A DEVELOPER DISCLOSE TO THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL:
(I) A STATEMENT OR DOCUMENTATION DESCRIBED IN THIS
SUBTITLE RELEVANT TO AN INVESTIGATION CONDUCTED BY THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL; AND

SENATE BILL 936
(II) A RISK MANAGEMENT POLICY DESIGNED AND
IMPLEMENTED, AN IMPACT ASSESSMENT COMPLETED, OR A RECORD MAINTAINED
UNDER THIS SUBTITLE RELEVANT TO AN INVESTIGATION CONDUCTED BY THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL;
(2) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, INITIATE A CIVIL
ACTION AGAINST A PERSON THAT VIOLATES THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(3) ADOPT REGULATIONS.
(C) (1) BEFORE BRINGING AN ACTION AGAINST A DEVELOPER OR
DEPLOYER FOR A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL, IN
CONSULTATION WITH THE DEVELOPER OR DEPLOYER, SHALL DETERMINE IF IT IS
POSSIBLE TO CURE THE VIOLATION.
(2) IF IT IS POSSIBLE TO CURE THE VIOLATION, THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL MAY ISSUE A NOTICE OF VIOLATION TO THE DEVELOPER OR DEPLOYER
AND AFFORD THE DEVELOPER OR DEPLOYER THE OPPORTUNITY TO CURE THE
VIOLATION WITHIN 45 DAYS AFTER THE RECEIPT OF THE NOTICE OF VIOLATION.
(3) IN DETERMINING WHETHER TO GRANT A DEVELOPER OR
DEPLOYER AN OPPORTUNITY TO CURE A VIOLATION, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
SHALL CONSIDER:
(I) THE NUMBER OF VIOLATIONS;
(II) THE SIZE AND COMPLEXITY OF THE DEVELOPER OR
DEPLOYER;
(III) THE NATURE AND EXTENT OF THE DEVELOPER’S OR
DEPLOYER’S BUSINESS;
(IV) WHETHER THERE IS A SUBSTANTIAL LIKELIHOOD OF
INJURY TO THE PUBLIC;
(V) THE SAFETY OF PERSONS OR PROPERTY; AND
(VI) WHETHER A VIOLATION WAS LIKELY CAUSED BY A HUMAN
OR TECHNICAL ERROR.
(4) IF A DEVELOPER OR DEPLOYER FAILS TO CURE A VIOLATION
WITHIN 45 DAYS AFTER THE RECEIPT OF A NOTICE OF VIOLATION UNDER

SENATE BILL 936 23
PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY PROCEED
WITH THE ACTION.
(D) IN AN ACTION BROUGHT BY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL UNDER THIS
SECTION, IT IS AN AFFIRMATIVE DEFENSE IF:
(1) A VIOLATION OF ANY PROVISION OF THIS SUBTITLE IS
DISCOVERED THROUGH RED–TEAMING, WHICH IS ADVERSARIAL TESTING
CONDUCTED FOR THE PURPOSE OF:
(I) IDENTIFYING THE POTENTIAL ADVERSE BEHAVIORS OR
OUTCOMES OF AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM;
(II) IDENTIFYING HOW THE BEHAVIORS OR OUTCOMES OCCUR;
AND
(III) STRESS TESTING THE SAFEGUARDS AGAINST THE
BEHAVIORS OR OUTCOMES; AND
(2) NOT LATER THAN 45 DAYS AFTER DISCOVERING A VIOLATION
UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE DEVELOPER OR DEPLOYER:
(I) CURES THE VIOLATION;
(II) PROVIDES NOTICE TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL IN A FORM
AND MANNER PRESCRIBED BY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL THAT THE VIOLATION HAS
BEEN CURED AND EVIDENCE THAT ANY HARM CAUSED BY SUCH VIOLATION HAS
BEEN MITIGATED; AND
(III) IS OTHERWISE IN COMPLIANCE WITH THE REQUIREMENTS
OF THIS SUBTITLE.
14–47A–08.
A CONSUMER MAY BRING A CIVIL ACTION AGAINST A DEPLOYER IF:
(1) THE CONSUMER INITIALLY FILED A TIMELY ADMINISTRATIVE
CHARGE OR COMPLAINT UNDER FEDERAL, STATE, OR LOCAL LAW ALLEGING A
DISCRIMINATORY ACT BY THE DEPLOYER AS A RESULT OF A CONSEQUENTIAL
DECISION ABOUT THE CONSUMER THAT IS MADE BY A HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM OF THE DEPLOYER;

SENATE BILL 936
(2) AT LEAST 180 DAYS HAVE ELAPSED SINCE THE DATE OF FILING OF
THE ADMINISTRATIVE COMPLAINT; AND
(3) THE CIVIL ACTION IS FILED NOT MORE THAN 2 YEARS AFTER THE
OCCURRENCE OF THE ALLEGED DISCRIMINATORY ACT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, if any provision of this Act or
the application of any provision of this Act to any person or circumstance is held invalid for
any reason in a court of competent jurisdiction, the invalidity does not affect other
provisions or any other application of this Act that can be given effect without the invalid
provision or application, and for this purpose the provisions of this Act are declared
severable.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.